Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1393
Historically significant real property; State Historic Preservation Officer; rules and regulations.

The State Historic Preservation Officer may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 77-1385 to 77-1394, including, but not limited to, provisions that:

(1) Preclude the issuance of a conditional, preliminary, or final certificate of rehabilitation for any owner-occupied single family residence if thirty percent or more of the dwelling space is new construction outside the existing structure;

(2) Specify what costs are eligible to meet the twenty-five percent minimum specified costs and make ineligible those costs attributable to new construction outside the existing structure; and

(3) Allow the issuance of a certificate of rehabilitation for a condominium.

Laws 2005, LB 66, § 9.